Tennessee, session 114, SB2379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Reckless Bullet Prevention
Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
39-17-1367.
(a) A person commits an offense who recklessly discharges a firearm into the
air, the ground, a body of water, or an object in proximity to the person if the firearm is
discharged at a place where other people are or may be present.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(c) This section does not apply if the firearm is discharged:
(1) By an officer of this state, or a county, city, or town, charged with the
enforcement of the laws of this state, when in the discharge of the officer's official
duties;
(2) By persons employed by the army, air force, navy, space force, coast
guard, or marine service of the United States or a member of the Tennessee
national guard when in the discharge of the person's official duties and acting
under orders requiring the person to carry a firearm;
(3) As required by an animal control officer, rabies control officer, or
Tennessee wildlife resources agency (TWRA) officer when in the discharge of
the officer's official duties;
SB2379
012482
- 1 -

(4) To lawfully take wildlife by permit or license during an open season
established by the Tennessee wildlife resources agency;
(5) For the control of nuisance wildlife by permit from the TWRA or the
United States fish and wildlife service;
(6) On the property of a public or privately owned sport shooting range,
as defined in § 39-17-316;
(7) In defense of self or another person against an animal attack if a
reasonable person would believe that deadly force against the animal is
immediately necessary and reasonable under the circumstances to protect
oneself or the other person; or
(8) In defense of a domestic animal against an imminent or ongoing
animal attack if a reasonable person would believe that deadly force against the
animal is immediately necessary and reasonable under the circumstances to
protect the domestic animal from attack.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351(e), is amended by
adding the following language before the last sentence that precedes the numbered list:
Beginning July 1, 2026, all department-approved handgun safety courses must include
instruction on § 39-17-1367.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts occurring on or after that date.
- 2 - 012482